incubator/apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
    <pardef n="/byť__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>byť</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <!-- Present -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>som</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sme</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ste</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sú</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Past -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bol</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bola</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bolo</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>boli</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     
      <!-- Future -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>budem</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>budeš</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bude</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>budeme</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>budete</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>budú</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>buď</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>buďme</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>buďte</l>
          <r>byť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Neuter_pivo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ám</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ách</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p/ivo__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ív</l>
          <r>ivo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e><i>iv</i><par n="Neuter_pivo"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/esto__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iest</l>
          <r>esto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e><i>est</i><par n="Neuter_pivo"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sk/lo__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iel</l>
          <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e><i>l</i><par n="Neuter_pivo"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ok/no__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ien</l>
          <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e><i>n</i><par n="Neuter_pivo"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Neuter_srdce">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iam</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iach</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/rdce__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ŕdc</l>
          <r>rdce<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e><i>rdc</i><par n="Neuter_srdce"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mor/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e><i></i><par n="Neuter_srdce"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="byť"><i/><par n="/byť__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="pivo"><i>p</i><par n="p/ivo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mesto"><i>m</i><par n="m/esto__n"/></e>
